District of Columbia statutes.
31-4708

Filing and approval of life policy forms.

A policy of life insurance shall not be issued or delivered in the District until the form of the same has been filed with the Commissioner, nor if the Commissioner gives written notice, within 30 days of such filing, to the company proposing to issue it, showing wherein the form of such policy does not comply with the requirements of the laws of the District, provided that such action of the Commissioner shall be subject to review by a court of competent jurisdiction.

History

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1164, ch. 672, ch. V, § 8
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10, 44 DCR 1730
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 23(c), 45 DCR 745

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-512.
1973 Ed., § 35-708.